Virginia statutes. Title 34. Homestead and Other Exemptions.
Chapter 1. General Provisions.

§ 34-1.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Creditor process”
means all methods used by creditors to collect unsecured debts.

“Debt”
means a legally enforceable monetary obligation or liability of any individual whether arising out of a contract or otherwise, but not an obligation resulting from an intentional tort.

“Exempt”
means protected from all forms of creditor process.

“Exemption”
means protection from all forms of creditor process.

“Homestead exemption”
means that exemption created by §

34-4

.

“Householder”
means any resident of Virginia.

“Laboring person”
means any person who receives wages for his services.

History.

Code 1919, § 6566; 1974, c. 272; 1978, c. 253; 1979, c. 674; 1990, c. 942.

Law Review.

For discussion of debtors’ exemptions, see 17 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 19 (1960).

For article on the need for reform of and a proposed revision of Virginia’s Exemption Statutes, see 37 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 127 (1980).

For comment, “In re Cheeseman: A Judicial Revision of Virginia’s Homestead Exemption Laws,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 391 (1982).

For article, “How Bankruptcy Exemptions Work: Virginia As an Illustration of Why the ‘Opt Out’ Clause Was a Bad Idea,” see 8 G.M.U. L. Rev. 1 (1985).

For survey on creditors’ rights in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

For essay, “A Distinction Without a Difference? An Examination of the Legal and Ethical Difference Between Asset Protection and Fraudulent Transfers Under Virginia Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 381 (2012).

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2 Attachment. § 2.2 Virginia’s Statutory Scheme, etc. Rendleman.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 22 Enforcement of Judgments. § 22.02 Judgment Liens, et seq. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C M.J. Bankruptcy, §§ 77, 79.

§ 34-2.
Injunction restraining sale of exempted property or garnishment of wages.

An injunction may be awarded to enjoin the sale of any property exempt under the provisions of this title, and to prevent the wages exempted by §

34-29

from being garnisheed or otherwise collected by an execution creditor.

History.

Code 1919, § 6565.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Injunctions, §§ 52, 70.

§ 34-3.
Articles not exempt from taxes or levies or for their purchase price.

The exemptions under §§

34-4

,

34-4

.1,

34-26

,

34-27

,

34-29

, and

64.2-311

shall not extend to distress or lien for state or local taxes or levies, nor to levy, distress, or lien for the purchase price of any articles claimed as exempt or any part of the price thereof nor for fines and damages or either arising from trespass by animals under §

55.1-2810

as to such animal so trespassing. If an article purchased and not paid for is exchanged or converted into other property of the debtor, such property shall not be exempt from payment of the unpaid purchase money debt.

History.

Code 1919, § 6563; 1990, c. 942; 1996, c. 323.

Cross references.

As to debts to which $2,000 homestead exemption of householder created by §

34-4

does not apply, see §

34-5

.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “64.1-151.3” was changed to “64.2-311” to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 by Acts
2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts
2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-2810” for “55-306.”

The 1996 amendment,

in the first sentence, inserted “or lien” following “distress” in two places and deleted “or” following “nor to levy.”

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1 Extra-Judicial Procedures. § 1.02 Self Help. Bryson.

§ 34-3.1.
Property specified in Bankruptcy Reform Act not exempt.

No individual may exempt from the property of the estate in any bankruptcy proceeding the property specified in subsection (d) of § 522 of the Bankruptcy Reform Act (Public Law 95-598), except as may otherwise be expressly permitted under this title.

History.

1979, c. 692.

Law Review.

For comment, “In re Cheeseman: A Judicial Revision of Virginia’s Homestead Exemption Laws,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 391 (1982).

For article, “How Bankruptcy Exemptions Work: Virginia As an Illustration of Why the ‘Opt Out’ Clause Was a Bad Idea,” see 8 G.M.U. L. Rev. 1 (1985).

For article on the distribution of assets in Chapter 7 bankruptcy proceedings closed during 1984-1987, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 303 (1988).

For article, “The Federal Law of Property: The Case of Inheritance Disclaimers and Tenancy by the Entireties,” see 75 Wash & Lee L. Rev. 3 (2018).

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 5 The Judgment Lien. § 5.7 Judgment Liens Under the Bankruptcy Code. Rendleman.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C M.J. Bankruptcy, §§ 72, 76.